Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [295.90] PFAS GROSS REVENUES TAX. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin (c) "Gross revenues" means the total amounts received in money or otherwise by the manufacture or retail sale of products containing PFAS in this state. new text end new text begin (d) "Manufacturer" means any person engaging in the production, preparation, propagation, conversion, or processing of products containing PFAS, either directly or indirectly, including packaging or repackaging, or any person whose brand name is affixed to the product. new text end new text begin (e) "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" means substances that include any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom. new text end new text begin (f) "Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, or public or private organization of any kind. Person does not include a governmental unit or agency, or instrumentality of a government entity. new text end new text begin (g) "Products containing PFAS" means products in which PFAS are deliberately added during the manufacture of a product where the continued presence of PFAS is desired in the final product or one of the product's components to perform a specific function. new text end new text begin (h) "Retailer" means any person making sales, leases, or rentals of products containing PFAS. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Nexus required. new text end new text begin (a) For a manufacturer, a person who maintains within this state, directly or by a subsidiary or an affiliate, a plant, center, office, warehouse, or other place where manufacturing occurs is deemed to have minimum contacts in Minnesota and is subject to the tax imposed under this section. new text end new text begin (b) For a retailer, a person who is required to collect and remit the tax imposed under chapter 297A is deemed to have minimum contacts in Minnesota and is subject to the tax imposed under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Tax imposed. new text end new text begin (a) For a manufacturer who has nexus in Minnesota under subdivision 2, a tax equal to 50 percent of gross revenue is imposed on revenue derived from products containing PFAS manufactured in Minnesota and sold to a distributor. new text end new text begin (b) For a retailer who has nexus in Minnesota under subdivision 2, a tax equal to 50 percent of gross revenue is imposed on revenue derived from the retail sale of products containing PFAS in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting requirements. new text end new text begin A person subject to the tax imposed by this section must submit a monthly informational report in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. No payment of any tax is required to be remitted with the report. The report must be filed on or before the tenth day following the end of each calendar month, regardless of whether or not the person manufactured or sold any products containing PFAS during the previous month, unless the commissioner determines that a longer filing period is appropriate for a particular person. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin Unless specifically provided otherwise, the audit, assessment, refund, penalty, interest, enforcement, collection remedies, appeal, and administrative provisions of chapters 270C and 289A, apply to the tax imposed under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Returns; payment of tax. new text end new text begin (a) A person owing tax under this section must report the tax on a return prescribed by the commissioner and must remit the tax on an annual basis in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The return and the tax must be filed and paid using the filing cycle and due dates provided for taxes imposed under section 289A.20, subdivision 1, and chapter 290. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Credit for taxes paid. new text end new text begin A person that has paid taxes to another jurisdiction measured by gross revenues and is subject to tax under this section on the same gross revenues is entitled to a credit for tax legally due and paid to another jurisdiction to the extent of the lesser of: new text end new text begin (1) the tax actually paid to the other jurisdiction; or new text end new text begin (2) the amount of tax imposed by Minnesota on the gross revenues subject to tax in the other taxing jurisdictions. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Interest on overpayments. new text end new text begin Interest must be paid on an overpayment refunded or credited to the taxpayer in the manner provided in section 289A.56, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Deposit of revenues. new text end new text begin The commissioner must deposit all revenues, including penalties and interest, derived from the tax imposed by this section in the general fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [295.91] CLEANUP ACCOUNT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin The purpose of this account is to provide funds for environmental cleanup around the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Account creation. new text end new text begin The xx cleanup account is hereby established in the special revenue fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Transfer of revenues. new text end new text begin (a) By July 15 annually, an amount equal to the funds raised by the tax imposed under section 295.90 must be transferred into the xx cleanup account. new text end new text begin (b) To the extent the commissioner of management and budget determines that revenues are available for transfer under paragraph (a) for the fiscal year, those amounts are appropriated from the general fund for deposit in the xx cleanup account. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Use of funds. new text end new text begin Funds in the xx cleanup account must be managed by the State Board of Investment and used for purposes prescribed by the XX Advisory Commission established under section 295.92. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [295.92] XX ADVISORY COMMISSION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The XX Advisory Commission is established. The purpose of the commission is to develop and recommend to the State Board of Investment the proper use of funds in the xx cleanup account. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commission consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two representatives appointed by the speaker of the house; new text end new text begin (2) two representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; new text end new text begin (3) two senators appointed by the senate majority leader; new text end new text begin (4) two senators appointed by the senate minority leader; and new text end new text begin (5) the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency or the commissioner's designee. new text end new text begin (b) Each appointing authority must make appointments by January 31 of the regular legislative session in the odd-numbered year. new text end new text begin (c) If the chair of the house or senate committee with primary jurisdiction over environment and natural resources is not an appointed member, the chair is an ex officio, nonvoting member of the commission. new text end new text begin (d) The voting members of the commission shall elect a chair and vice-chair. An appointee designated by the house shall convene the commission's first meeting. Decisions of the commission must be made by majority vote. The Pollution Control Agency must provide office space and administrative support to the commission. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commission must meet in intervals established by the commission at its first meeting. new text end new text begin (b) Meetings of the commission are subject to chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin The commission must make its recommendations on the proper use of money in the xx cleanup account in a report to the State Board of Investment each year no later than January 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Terms; vacancies. new text end new text begin (a) Members of the commission serve a term beginning upon appointment and ending at the beginning of the regular legislative session in the next odd-numbered year. The appropriate appointing authority must fill a vacancy for a seat of a current legislator for the remainder of the unexpired term. Members may be removed or replaced at the pleasure of the appointing authority. new text end new text begin (b) If a commission member ceases to be a member of the legislative body from which the member was appointed, the member vacates membership on the commission. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Officers. new text end new text begin The chair and vice-chair must alternate every two years between members of the house of representatives and senate. The chair and vice-chair may not be from the same legislative chamber. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expenses. new text end new text begin The members of the commission and its staff shall be reimbursed for all expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. Reimbursement for expenses incurred shall be made in accordance with policies adopted by the Legislative Coordinating Commission. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Initial appointments. new text end new text begin Appointing authorities for the commission must make initial appointments by January 15, 2026. The speaker of the house must designate one member of the commission to convene the first meeting of the commission by July 1, 2026. The first report of the commission is due on December 15, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end